Washington statutes.
RCW 8.28.050

City in adjoining state may condemn watershed property.

That any municipal corporation of any state adjoining the state of Washington may acquire title to any land or water right within the state of Washington, by purchase or condemnation, which lies within any watershed from which said municipal corporation obtains or desires to obtain its water supply.

[ 1909 c 16 s 1; RRS s 9280.]